District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.17

Repealed

Loans secured by corporation’s own stock prohibited; release of borrower.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 621
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.17.
1981 Ed., § 29-217.
1973 Ed., § 29-217.